Massachusetts, session 194th, H1727.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, there shall be a special
legislative commission established pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws to
study the potential for legislative action to increase racial diversity among the judiciary in the
Commonwealth. The commission shall consist of 15 members: 2 of whom shall be the chairs of
the joint committee on the judiciary or their designees, who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 of whom
shall be the chair of the Massachusetts Black and Latino Legislative Caucus or a designee; 1 of
whom shall be the chair of the Massachusetts House Asian Caucus or a designee; 1 of whom
shall be the attorney general or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the secretary of public safety and
security or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the executive director of the American Civil Liberties
Union of Massachusetts, Inc. or a designee; 1 of whom shall be the president of the National
of 2

Association for the Advancement of Colored People New England Area Conference or a
designee; 2 of whom shall be appointed by the Governor’s Council; and 8 of whom shall be
appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be from the Massachusetts Bar Association, 1 of
whom shall be from the Boston Bar Association, 1 of whom shall be from the Massachusetts
Black Lawyers Association, 1 of whom shall be from the Massachusetts Association of Hispanic
Attorneys, 1 of whom shall be from the Asian American Lawyers Association of Massachusetts,
1 of whom shall be from the Massachusetts District Attorney’s Association or an Assistant
District Attorney, and 1 of whom shall be from the Committee for Public Counsel Services.
(b) The appointments made by the governor pursuant to subsection (a) shall include
women and people of color in such proportion as these groups exist in the commonwealth’s
population as periodically determined by the state secretary as the commonwealth’s chief census
officer.
(c) The commission shall evaluate the current and historic state of racial diversity among
judges in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts including, but not limited to: (i) the impact
legislative action could have on racial diversity within the judiciary; (ii) recommendations to
ensure increased racial diversity across the judiciary; (iii) proposed standards for admission to
the judiciary, including, but not limited to, age, education, community of origin, psychological
and mental health; and (iv) any other information the commission deems relevant.
(d) The commission shall submit its findings and recommendations relative to increasing
racial diversity within the judiciary by filing the same with the clerks of the house of
representatives, the senate, the Governor’s Council, and the Governor not later than December
31, 2026.
of 2